Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2975
Resignation and removal of officers.

(1) The board of directors may remove an officer at any time with or without cause.

(2) An officer may resign at any time in a record giving notice to the limited cooperative association. The resignation is effective when the notice is given unless the notice specifies a later time.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 75.